Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-239
Raw fur, defined.

Raw fur means the untanned pelts of any fur-bearing animal except commercially reared mutations.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 49;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 10.